Alaska, session 34, HB316.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 09.17.010(b) is amended to read: 05 (b) Except as provided under (c) of this section, the damages awarded by a 06 court or a jury under (a) of this section for all claims, including a loss of consortium 07 claim, arising out of a single injury or death may not exceed $400,000 or the injured 08 person's life expectancy in years multiplied by $8,000, adjusted under (e) of this 09 section, whichever is greater. 10 * Sec. 2. AS 09.17.010(c) is amended to read: 11 (c) In an action for personal injury, the damages awarded by a court or jury 12 that are described under (b) of this section may not exceed $1,000,000 or the person's 13 life expectancy in years multiplied by $25,000, whichever is greater, adjusted under 14 (e) of this section, when the damages are awarded for severe permanent physical 01 impairment or severe disfigurement. 02 * Sec. 3. AS 09.17.010 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 03 (e) The maximum amount of damages specified under (b) and (c) of this 04 section shall be adjusted for inflation using 100 percent of the change since 1997 in 05 the Consumer Price Index for all urban consumers for urban Alaska, compiled by the 06 Bureau of Labor Statistics, United States Department of Labor. 07 * Sec. 4. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 08 read: 09 APPLICABILITY. Sections 1 - 3 of this Act apply to damages awarded on or after the 10 effective date of this Act. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.